xapian-core/languages/algorithms/dutch.sbl
// Alias: nl kraaij_pohlmann

// Dutch stemming algorithm developed by Wessel Kraaij and Renée Pohlmann

strings ( ch )
integers ( p1 p2 )
booleans ( stemmed GE_removed )

routines (

   R1 R2
   C V VX
   lengthen_V
   Step_1 Step_2 Step_3 Step_4 Step_7
   Step_6 Step_1c
   Lose_prefix
   Lose_infix
   measure
)

externals ( stem )

groupings ( v v_WX A AEIOU AIOU E I O U )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters */

stringdef a`   '{U+00E0}'
stringdef a'   '{U+00E1}'
stringdef a^   '{U+00E2}'
stringdef a"   '{U+00E4}'
stringdef e`   '{U+00E8}'
stringdef e'   '{U+00E9}'
stringdef e^   '{U+00EA}'
stringdef e"   '{U+00EB}'
stringdef i`   '{U+00EC}'
stringdef i'   '{U+00ED}'
stringdef i^   '{U+00EE}'
stringdef i"   '{U+00EF}'
stringdef o`   '{U+00F2}'
stringdef o'   '{U+00F3}'
stringdef o^   '{U+00F4}'
stringdef o"   '{U+00F6}'
stringdef u`   '{U+00F9}'
stringdef u'   '{U+00FA}'
stringdef u^   '{U+00FB}'
stringdef u"   '{U+00FC}'

define A        'a{a"}{a'}{a`}{a^}'
define E        'e{e"}{e'}{e`}{e^}'
define I        'i{i"}{i'}{i`}{i^}'
define O        'o{o"}{o'}{o`}{o^}'
define U        'u{u"}{u'}{u`}{u^}'

define AIOU     A + I + O + U
define AEIOU    A + E + I + O + U
define v        AEIOU + 'y'
define v_WX     v + 'wx'

backwardmode (

    define R1 as ($p1 <= cursor)
    define R2 as ($p2 <= cursor)

    define V  as test (v or 'ij')
    define VX as test (next v or 'ij')
    define C  as test (not 'ij' non-v)

    define lengthen_V as do (
        non-v_WX
        [substring] among (
            'a' '{a"}' '{a'}' '{a`}' '{a^}'
            'o' '{o"}' '{o'}' '{o`}' '{o^}'
            'u' '{u"}' '{u'}' '{u`}' '{u^}'
                (test (non-AEIOU or atlimit)
                 ->ch insert ch)
            'e' '{e'}' '{e`}' '{e^}'
                (test (non-AEIOU or atlimit
                               not (AIOU or (E atlimit))
                               not (next AIOU non-AEIOU))
                 ->ch insert ch)
            'e{e"}'
                (<-'e{e"}e')
            'i{e"}'
                (<-'iee')
        )
    )

    define Step_1 as
    (
        [substring] among (

            '{'}s' (delete)
            's'    (R1 not ('t' R1) C delete)
            'ies'  (R1 <-'ie')
            'es'
                   ((test ('ar' R1 C) delete lengthen_V) or
                    (test ('er' R1 C) delete) or
                    (R1 C <-'e'))

            '{e'}s'
                   (R1 <-'{e'}')
            'aus'  (R1 V <-'au')
            'en'   (('hed' R1 ] <-'heid') or
                    ('nd' delete) or
                    ('d' R1 C ] delete) or
                    ('i' or 'j' V delete) or
                    (R1 C delete lengthen_V))
            'nde'  (<-'nd')
        )
    )

    define Step_2 as
    (
        [substring] among (
            'je'   (('{'}t' ] delete) or
                    ('et'   ] R1 C delete) or
                    ('rnt'  ] <-'rn') or
                    ('t'    ] R1 VX delete) or
                    ('ink'  ] <-'ing') or
                    ('mp'   ] <-'m') or
                    ('{'}'  ] R1 delete) or
                    (] R1 C delete))
            'ge'   (R1 <-'g')
            'lijke'(R1 <-'lijk')
            'ische'(R1 <-'isch')
            'de'   (R1 C delete)
            'te'   (R1 <-'t')
            'se'   (R1 <-'s')
            're'   (R1 <-'r')
            'le'   (R1 delete attach 'l' lengthen_V)
            'ene'  (R1 C delete attach 'en' lengthen_V)
            'ieve' (R1 C <-'ief')
        )
    )

    define Step_3 as
    (
        [substring] among (
            'atie'  (R1 <-'eer')
            'iteit' (R1 delete lengthen_V)
            'heid'
            'sel'
            'ster'  (R1 delete)
            'rder'  (<-'r')
            'ing'
            'isme'
            'erij'  (// Exception added to avoid conflating
                     // `schilderij` (painting) and `schild` (shield).
                     ('ild' <- 'er')
                     or
                     (R1 delete lengthen_V))
            'arij'  (R1 C <-'aar')
            'fie'   (R2 delete attach 'f' lengthen_V)
            'gie'   (R2 delete attach 'g' lengthen_V)
            'tst'   (R1 C <-'t')
            'dst'   (R1 C <-'d')
        )
    )

    define Step_4 as
    (
        (   [substring] among (
                'ioneel'  (R1 <-'ie')
                'atief'   (R1 <-'eer')
                'baar'    (R1 delete)
                'naar'    (R1 V <-'n')
                'laar'    (R1 V <-'l')
                'raar'    (R1 V <-'r')
                'tant'    (R1 <-'teer')
                'lijker'
                'lijkst'  (R1 <-'lijk')
                'achtig'
                'achtiger'
                'achtigst'(R1 delete)
                'eriger'
                'erigst'
                'erig'
                'end'     (R1 C delete lengthen_V)
            )
        )
        or
        (   [substring] among (
                'iger'
                'igst'
                'ig'      (R1
                           // Exception added to avoid conflating
                           // `innig` (intimate) and `in` (in).
                           not ('inn' atlimit)
                           C delete lengthen_V)
            )
        )
    )

    define Step_7 as
    (
        [substring] among (
            'kt'   (<-'k')
            'ft'   (<-'f')
            'pt'   (<-'p')
        )
    )

    define Step_6 as
    (
        [substring] among (
            'bb'   (<-'b')
            'cc'   (<-'c')
            'dd'   (<-'d')
            'ff'   (<-'f')
            'gg'   (<-'g')
            'hh'   (<-'h')
            'jj'   (<-'j')
            'kk'   (<-'k')
            'll'   (<-'l')
            'mm'   (<-'m')
            'nn'   (// Exception added to avoid conflating
                    // `innen` (to collect/cash) and `in` (in).
                    not ('i' atlimit)
                    <-'n')
            'pp'   (<-'p')
            'qq'   (<-'q')
            'rr'   (<-'r')
            'ss'   (<-'s')
            'tt'   (<-'t')
            'vv'   (<-'v')
            'ww'   (<-'w')
            'xx'   (<-'x')
            'zz'   (<-'z')
            'v'    (<-'f')
            'z'    (<-'s')
        )
    )

    define Step_1c as
    (
        [substring] R1 C among (
            'd' (not ('n' R1)
                 // Exception added to avoid conflating
                 // `geïnd` (collected/cashed) and `in` (in).
                 // Instead we conflate `geïnd` with `innen`.
                 ('in' atlimit <-'n') or
                 delete)
            't' (not ('h' R1)
                 // Exception added to avoid conflating
                 // `geënt` (grafted) and `en` (and).
                 not ('en' atlimit)
                 delete
            )
        )
    )
)

define Lose_prefix as (
    ['ge'] test hop 3 test (gopast ('ij' or v) repeat ('ij' or v) not atlimit)
    // Exceptions added:
    among (
        // Avoid conflating `geeft` and `effen`/`effende`\`geeffende`.
        'eft' (false)

        // Avoid conflating `gevallen`/`geval` and `vallen`.
        'val' (false)
        'vali' (true)

        // Avoid conflating `gevaren`/`gevaar` (danger), `gevaarten` (huge
        // objects) and `varen` (to sail)
        'vaa' 'vare' (false)

        '' (true)
    )
    set GE_removed
    delete
    do ( [substring] among (
        '{e"}' (<-'e')
        '{i"}' (<-'i')
      )
    )
)

define Lose_infix as (
    next
    gopast (['ge']) test hop 3 test (gopast ('ij' or v) repeat ('ij' or v) not atlimit)
    set GE_removed
    delete
    do ( [substring] among (
        '{e"}' (<-'e')
        '{i"}' (<-'i')
      )
    )
)

define measure as (
    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit
    do(
        repeat non-v  atleast 1 ('ij' or v)  non-v  setmark p1
        repeat non-v  atleast 1 ('ij' or v)  non-v  setmark p2
    )

)
define stem as (

    unset stemmed

    measure

    backwards (
            do (Step_1 set stemmed )
            do (Step_2 set stemmed )
            do (Step_3 set stemmed )
            do (Step_4 set stemmed )
    )
    unset GE_removed
    do (Lose_prefix and measure)
    backwards (
            do (GE_removed set stemmed Step_1c)
        )
    unset GE_removed
    do (Lose_infix and measure)
    backwards (
            do (GE_removed set stemmed Step_1c)
        )
    backwards (
            do (Step_7 set stemmed )
            do (stemmed Step_6)
        )
)
